Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1259YH (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 112 Section 1. Section 15.102, subsection 12, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âTargeted small businessâ means a small business any 3 enterprise which is fifty-one percent or more owned, operated, 4 and actively managed by one or more women, minority persons, 5 service-disabled veterans, or persons with a disability 6 provided the business enterprise meets all of the following 7 requirements: 8 (1) Is located in this state. 9 (2) Is operated for profit and under a single management . 10 (3) Has either fewer than twenty employees or an annual 11 gross income of less than four two hundred million dollars 12 computed as an average of the three preceding fiscal years. 13